New Jersey, session 221, S1603.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Beginning with the State fiscal year 2025 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury shall establish a separate fringe benefit rate for State colleges and universities.  The separate fringe benefit rate shall reflect the actual cost of employee retirement programs at those colleges and universities, and shall be applied to all federal, dedicated, and non-State funded programs. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.